California, session 20252026, SB1360.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2103 of the Elections Code is amended to read:2103. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the election board of each county, in order to promote and encourage voter registrations, shall establish a sufficient number of registration places throughout the county, and outside the county courthouse, for the convenience of persons desiring to register, to the end that registration may be maintained at a high level.(b) It is also the intent of the Legislature that county elections officials, in order to promote and encourage voter registrations, shall enlist the support and cooperation of interested citizens and organizations in such a way as to reach most effectively every resident of the county.(c) It is also the intent of the Legislature that non-English-speaking citizens, like all other citizens, should be encouraged to vote. Therefore, appropriate efforts should be made to minimize obstacles to registration by citizens who lack sufficient skill in English to register without assistance.(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that county elections officials be permitted to distribute affidavits of registration and voter registration cards, in all languages required by Section 14032, or Section 203 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503) or Section 4(f)(4) (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10303(f)(4)) of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, by using the county’s internet website.SEC. 2. Section 2158 of the Elections Code is amended to read:2158. County elections officials shall do all of the following:(a) Provide voter registration cards designed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2157 for the registration of voters at his or her their office and in a sufficient number of locations throughout the county for the convenience of persons desiring to register, to the end that registration may be maintained at a high level. The cards shall be available in all languages required by Section 14032, or Section 203 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503) or Section 4(f)(4) (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10303(f)(4)) of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965.(b) Provide voter registration cards designed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2157 in sufficient quantities to any individuals or organizations that wish to distribute the cards other than to persons who have been convicted of violating this section within the last five years. Individuals and organizations shall be permitted to distribute voter registration cards anywhere within the county.(1) An individual or organization that distributes voter registration cards designed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2157 shall obtain the voter registration cards from the county elections official or the Secretary of State. The individual or organization shall comply with all applicable regulations established by the Secretary of State when distributing the cards.(2) If, after completing his or her their voter registration card, an elector entrusts it to another person, the latter shall sign and date the attached, numbered receipt indicating his or her their address and telephone number, if any, and give the receipt to the elector. Failure to comply with this paragraph shall not cause the invalidation of the registration of a voter.(3) An individual or organization that distributes voter registration cards designed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2157 shall give a voter registration card to any elector requesting it, provided that the individual or organization has a sufficient number of cards.(4) If distribution of voter registration cards pursuant to this subdivision is undertaken by mailing cards to persons who have not requested the cards, the person mailing the cards shall enclose a cover letter or other notice with each card instructing the recipients to disregard the cards if they are currently registered voters.(c) Mail a voter registration card immediately to a person who wishes to register to vote and requests a voter registration card.SEC. 3. Section 2201 of the Elections Code is amended to read:2201. (a) The county elections official shall cancel the registration in the following cases:(1) At the signed, written request of the person registered.(2) When the mental incompetency of the person registered is legally established as provided in Sections 2208, 2209, 2210, and 2211. The county elections office shall use only information provided by the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2211.5 to cancel a voter registration for this reason.(3) Upon proof that the person is presently imprisoned for conviction of a felony. The county elections office shall use only information provided by the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2212, by a United States District Court, or by the Federal Bureau of Prisons to cancel a voter registration for this reason.(4) Upon the production of a certified copy of a judgment directing the cancellation to be made.(5) Upon the death of the person registered.(6) Pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 2220).(7) Upon official notification that the voter is registered to vote in another state.(8) Upon proof that the person is otherwise ineligible to vote.(b) The Secretary of State may cancel the registration in the following cases:(1) When the mental incompetency of the person registered is legally established as provided in Sections 2208, 2209, 2210, and 2211.(2) Upon proof that the person is presently imprisoned for the conviction of a felony.(3) Upon the death of the person registered.(c) (1) Between 15 and 30 days, inclusive, before canceling a person’s registration for the reasons specified in paragraph (2), (3), (5), or (6) of subdivision (a), the county elections official shall send a forwardable notice by first-class mail, including a postage-paid and preaddressed return form, to the voter.(A) The forwardable notice shall be provided in the person’s preferred language if the county is required to provide translated ballots in that language pursuant to Section 14032 or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503).(B) The notice shall include a statement substantially similar to the following:“IMPORTANT NOTICE. Your voter registration record is scheduled to be canceled on [date]. This cancellation is due to information the [county name] County elections office has received indicating your ineligibility to vote in that county due to a change of residence, death, prison commitment or mental incapacity to vote pursuant to Sections 2208, 2209, 2210, or 2211 of the California Elections Code, as applicable.If you believe this cancellation is in error, please notify our office within 15 days from the date of this notice either by returning the attached postage-paid postcard or by calling [county elections office phone number] toll free.If we do not receive your response to this notice, you may be required to reregister to vote in the next election or to vote using a provisional ballot. You can find more information about voter eligibility rules on the Secretary of State’s internet website at [URL] or voter hotline at [phone numbers]. You can also check your current registration status at [URL].”(2) The preaddressed return form described in paragraph (1) shall include all of the following:(A) Space for the voter to provide their current place of residence.(B) Space for the voter to provide their current mailing address, if different from the place of residence.(C) A box next to a statement substantially similar to the following: “The cancellation of my voter record is in error because I have not been deemed mentally incompetent to vote by a court of law, I am not currently serving a state or federal prison term, and I have not died. Additionally, if I have moved, I have provided my new residential address on this form.”(D) Space for the voter to provide their signature and the date.(3) The elections official may send additional written notices to a voter, and may also notify the voter in person, by telephone or email, or by other means of the planned registration cancellation.SEC. 4. Section 2265 of the Elections Code is amended to read:2265. (a) (1) The department, in consultation with the Secretary of State, shall establish a schedule and method for the department to electronically provide to the Secretary of State the records specified in this section.(2) The department and the Secretary of State shall develop and enter into an interagency agreement specifying how the department and the Secretary of State will cooperate to fulfill the requirements of this chapter. The agreement shall be updated as necessary, and the current version of the agreement shall be published on the internet website of the Secretary of State, except those parts of the agreement for which publication would compromise security.(b) (1) The department shall provide to the Secretary of State, in a manner and method to be determined by the department in consultation with the Secretary of State, the following information associated with each person who submits a driver’s license application:(A) Name.(B) Date of birth.(C) Either or both of the following, as contained in the department’s records:(i) Residence address.(ii) Mailing address.(D) Digitized signature, as described in Section 12950.5 of the Vehicle Code.(E) Telephone number, if available.(F) Email address, if available.(G) Language preference, if available.(H) Political party preference, if available.(I) Whether the person chooses to become a permanent vote by mail voter, if available.(J) Whether the person affirmatively declined to become registered or preregistered to vote during a transaction with the department.(K) A notation that the applicant has attested that the person meets all voter eligibility requirements, including United States citizenship, specified in Section 2101 and, as applicable, the preregistration eligibility requirements in subdivision (d) of Section 2102.(L) Other information specified in regulations implementing this chapter.(2) (A) A completed voter registration application included with a driver’s license application and accepted at the department shall be transmitted to the Secretary of State no later than 10 days after the department accepts it.(B) A completed voter registration application accepted within five days of the last day to register to vote for a federal or statewide election shall be transmitted to the Secretary of State no later than five days after the date of acceptance.(C) (i) For purposes of establishing the department’s transmittal deadlines required by this paragraph and by Section 20504(e) of Title 52 of the United States Code, the completed voter registration application included with the driver’s license application shall be deemed accepted on the date the completed voter registration application arrives at the department, whether by mail, in person, electronically, or in another manner, the application contains all of the information in paragraph (1) except to the extent paragraph (1) requires certain information to be provided only if available, and the department approves the documentation of identity submitted by the applicant that is required by the Vehicle Code for the type of license or identification card for which the applicant has applied.(ii) This subparagraph shall become operative upon the completion of the Digital eXperience Platform project described in Item 2740-001-0044 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), or on July 1, 2025, whichever is earlier.(3) (A) The department shall accept and transmit a completed voter registration application included with a driver’s license application as described in paragraph (2) even if, pursuant to the Vehicle Code, the driver’s license application is incomplete or the driver’s license or identification card associated with the voter who submitted the voter registration application is inactive due to a failure to pay fees, or any other reason that is unrelated to either of the following:(i) The department’s approval of an applicant’s identity documentation pursuant to the Vehicle Code.(ii) An elections official’s ability to prevent duplicate voter registrations or preregistrations, to assess the eligibility of the applicant, or to administer voter registration, preregistration, and other elections procedures.(B) This paragraph shall become operative upon the completion of the Digital eXperience Platform project described in Item 2740-001-0044 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021), or on July 1, 2025, whichever is earlier.(4) (A) The department may provide the records described in paragraph (1) to the Secretary of State before the Secretary of State certifies that all of the conditions set forth in subdivision (e) of this section have been satisfied. Records provided pursuant to this paragraph shall only be used for purposes of outreach and education to eligible voters conducted by the Secretary of State.(B) The Secretary of State shall provide materials created for purposes of outreach and education as described in this paragraph in languages other than English, as required by Section 14032 or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503).(c) The Secretary of State shall not sell, transfer, or allow any third party access to the information acquired from the department pursuant to this chapter without approval of the department, except as permitted by this chapter and Section 2194.(d) The department shall not electronically provide records of a person who applies for or is issued a driver’s license pursuant to Section 12801.9 of the Vehicle Code because the person is unable to submit satisfactory proof that the person’s presence in the United States is authorized under federal law.(e) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (b), the department shall commence implementation of this section no later than one year after the Secretary of State certifies all of the following:(1) The state has a statewide voter registration database that complies with the requirements of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).(2) The Legislature has appropriated the funds necessary for the Secretary of State and the department to implement and maintain the California New Motor Voter Program.(3) The regulations required by Section 2277 have been adopted.(f) The department shall not electronically provide records pursuant to this section that contain a home address designated as confidential pursuant to Section 1808.2, 1808.4, or 1808.6 of the Vehicle Code.(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department continue its best practice of sending notice to voters when there is a delay in processing completed voter registration applications. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the notices continue to provide information about alternative options for submitting a voter registration application.SEC. 5. Section 2406 of the Elections Code is amended to read:2406. (a) A voter registration agency shall do all of the following:(1) Notify the county elections official of each applicable county of the location of each of the voter registration agency’s offices or sites within the county.(2) Designate an agency employee to be responsible for the agency’s compliance with this section.(3) Request voter registration cards from the applicable county elections official, as needed.(4) Take steps to ensure that the voter registration agency, and each office or site of the voter registration agency, has a sufficient supply of voter preference forms and voter registration cards available, including voter preference forms and voter registration cards in all languages required by Section 14032, or Section 203 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503) or Section 4(f)(4) (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10303(f)(4)) of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965.(5) Ensure that each employee of the voter registration agency who may provide voter registration services completes, at least once per year, a training based on the training materials prepared by the Secretary of State on the requirements of this chapter and the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.). The voter registration agency may incorporate this training into any other training program provided by the voter registration agency for its employees.(b) A voter registration agency may conduct a review of the agency, or an office or site of the agency, as necessary, to ensure compliance with this chapter and the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.).SEC. 6. Section 2408 of the Elections Code is amended to read:2408. (a) A voter registration agency that allows a person to apply online for service or assistance, or to submit a recertification, renewal, or change of address form relating to the service or assistance online, shall implement a process and infrastructure that allows an applicant to electronically submit a voter preference form to the voter registration agency, and to submit an affidavit of voter registration electronically on the internet website of the Secretary of State in accordance with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 2196).(b) If a person indicates on his or her their electronic voter preference form that he or she would like to register to vote, the person shall be informed that he or she may register to vote through one of the following options, if applicable:(1) Submit an affidavit of voter registration electronically on the Secretary of State’s internet website pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2196.(2) Complete an affidavit of voter registration electronically on the Secretary of State’s internet website, print a hard copy of the completed affidavit, and mail or deliver the hard copy of the completed affidavit to the Secretary of State or the appropriate county elections official pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2196.(c) A voter registration agency may take steps to ensure that the information entered into a person’s electronic application for service or assistance, or his or her their electronic recertification, renewal, or change of address form relating to the service or assistance, will be automatically transferred to the electronic affidavit of voter registration if the person indicates that he or she would like to register to vote.(d) The Secretary of State shall take steps to ensure that the electronic affidavit of voter registration is available, and may be electronically submitted and verified, in all languages in which a county is required to provide voting materials pursuant to Section 14032, or Section 203 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503) or Section 4(f)(4) (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10303(f)(4)) of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965.SEC. 7. Section 4005 of the Elections Code, as amended by Section 1 of Chapter 480 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:4005. (a) Notwithstanding Section 4000 or any other law, any county may conduct any election as an all-mailed ballot election if all of the following apply:(1) (A) At least two ballot dropoff locations are provided within the jurisdiction where the election is held or the number of ballot dropoff locations are fixed in a manner so that there is at least one ballot dropoff location provided for every 15,000 registered voters within the jurisdiction where the election is held, as determined on the 88th day before the day of the election, whichever results in more ballot dropoff locations. For purposes of this subparagraph, a vote center that includes an exterior ballot drop box counts only as a single ballot dropoff location. Ballot dropoff locations shall comply with the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3025.(B) A ballot dropoff location provided for under this section consists of a secure, accessible, and locked ballot box located as near as possible to established public transportation routes and that is able to receive voted ballots. All ballot dropoff locations shall be open at least during regular business hours beginning not less than 28 days before the day of the election, and on the day of the election. At least one ballot dropoff location shall be an accessible, secured, exterior drop box that is available for a minimum of 12 hours per day including regular business hours.(2) (A) The county elections official permits a voter residing in the county to do any of the following at a vote center:(i) Return, or vote and return, the voter’s vote by mail ballot.(ii) Register to vote, update the voter’s voter registration, and vote pursuant to Section 2170.(iii) Receive and vote a provisional ballot pursuant to Section 3016 or Article 5 (commencing with Section 14310) of Chapter 3 of Division 14.(iv) Receive a replacement ballot upon verification that a ballot for the same election has not been received from the voter by the county elections official. If the county elections official is unable to determine if a ballot for the same election has been received from the voter, the county elections official may issue a provisional ballot.(v) Vote a regular, provisional, or replacement ballot using accessible voting equipment that provides for a private and independent voting experience.(B) Each vote center shall have at least three voting machines that are accessible to voters with disabilities.(3) (A) On the day of the election, from 7 a.m. to 8 p.m., inclusive, and on each of the three days before the election, for a minimum of eight hours per day, at least one vote center is provided for every 10,000 registered voters within the jurisdiction where the election is held, as determined on the 88th day before the day of the election. At least 90 percent of the number of vote centers required by this subparagraph shall be open for all four days during the required times. Up to 10 percent of the number of vote centers required by this subparagraph may be open for less than four days if at least one vote center is provided for every 10,000 registered voters on each day.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 20,000 registered voters, a minimum of two vote centers are provided on the day of the election and on each of the three days before the election within the jurisdiction where the election is held.(4) (A) Beginning 10 days before the day of the election and continuing daily up to and including the fourth day before the election, for a minimum of eight hours per day, at least one vote center is provided for every 50,000 registered voters within the jurisdiction where the election is held, as determined on the 88th day before the day of the election.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 50,000 registered voters, a minimum of two vote centers are provided within the jurisdiction where the election is held.(C) The vote centers provided under this section are established in accordance with the accessibility requirements described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 12280) of Chapter 3 of Division 12, the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.), and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(D) The vote centers provided under this section are equitably distributed across the county so as to afford maximally convenient options for voters and are established at accessible locations as near as possible to established public transportation routes. The vote centers shall be equipped with voting units or systems that are accessible to individuals with disabilities and that provide the same opportunity for access and participation as is provided to voters who are not disabled, including the ability to vote privately and independently in accordance with Sections 12280 and 19240.(E) (i) The vote centers provided under this section have an electronic mechanism for the county elections official to immediately access, at a minimum, all of the following voter registration data:(I) Name.(II) Address.(III) Date of birth.(IV) Language preference.(V) Party preference.(VI) Precinct.(VII) Whether or not the voter has been issued a vote by mail ballot and whether or not a ballot has been received by the county elections official.(ii) The electronic mechanism used to access voter registration data shall not be connected in any way to a voting system.(5) A method is available for voters with disabilities to request and receive a blank vote by mail ballot and, if a replacement ballot is necessary, a blank replacement ballot that voters with disabilities can read and mark privately and independently pursuant to the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).(6) (A) Except as otherwise provided for in this section, election boards for the vote centers established under this section meet the requirements for eligibility and composition pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 4 of Division 12.(B) Each vote center provides language assistance in all languages required in the jurisdiction under subdivision (c) of Section 12303, Section 14032, or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.) in a manner that enables voters of the applicable language minority groups to participate effectively in the electoral process. Each vote center shall post information regarding the availability of language assistance in English and all other languages for which language assistance is required to be provided in the jurisdiction under subdivision (c) of Section 12303, Section 14032, or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(i) If a vote center is located in, or adjacent to, a precinct, census tract, or other defined geographical subsection required to establish language requirements under subdivision (c) of Section 12303, Section 14032, or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), or if it is identified as needing language assistance through the public input process described in clause (ii), the county elections official shall ensure that the vote center is staffed by election board members who speak the required language. If the county elections official is unable to recruit election board members who speak the required language, alternative methods of effective language assistance shall be provided by the county elections official.(ii) The county elections official shall solicit public input regarding which vote centers should be staffed by election board members who are fluent in a language in addition to English pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 12303, Section 14032, and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(iii) The county elections official shall provide notice in the sample ballot, in vote by mail materials, and on the official’s internet website of the specific language services available at each vote center.(iv) Each vote center shall post information regarding the availability of language assistance services, including any language assistance hotlines provided by the county or Secretary of State.(C) Each vote center provides election materials translated in all languages required in the jurisdiction under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(D) Each vote center provides reasonable modifications and auxiliary aids and services as required by the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) and the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.).(7) (A) Beginning 10 days before the election, the county elections official maintains, in an electronic format, an index of voters who have done any of the following at one of the vote centers established pursuant to this section:(i) Registered to vote or updated the voter’s voter registration.(ii) Received and voted a provisional ballot or replacement ballot.(iii) Voted a ballot using equipment at the vote center.(B) The index required by subparagraph (A) includes the same information for each voter as is required to be included on copies of the roster that are posted pursuant to Section 14294. The index required by subparagraph (A) shall be updated continuously during any time that a vote center is open in the jurisdiction.(8) (A) No later than 29 days before the day of the election, the county elections official begins mailing to registered voters a vote by mail ballot packet that includes a return envelope with instructions for the use and return of the vote by mail ballot. The county elections official shall have five days to mail a ballot to each person who is registered to vote on the 29th day before the day of the election and five days for each subsequent registered voter. The county elections official shall not discriminate against any region or precinct in the county in choosing which ballots to mail first within the prescribed five-day mailing period.(B) The county elections official delivers to each voter, with either the sample ballot sent pursuant to Section 13303 or with the vote by mail ballot packet, all of the following:(i) A notice, translated in all languages required under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), that informs voters of all of the following:(I) An all-mailed ballot election is being conducted and each eligible voter will be issued a vote by mail ballot by mail.(II) The voter may cast a vote by mail ballot in person at a vote center during the times and days specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) or on election day.(III) No later than seven days before the day of the election, the voter may request the county elections official to send a vote by mail ballot in a language other than English pursuant to Section 14032 or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), or a facsimile copy of the ballot printed in a language other than English pursuant to Section 14201.(IV) No later than seven days before the day of the election, the voter may request the county elections official to send or deliver a ballot that voters with disabilities can read and mark privately and independently pursuant to the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).(V) Language assistance hotlines provided by the county or Secretary of State.(ii) A list of the ballot dropoff locations and vote centers established pursuant to this section, including the dates and hours they are open. The list shall also be posted on the internet website of the county elections official in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.(iii) A postage-paid postcard that the voter may return to the county elections official for the purpose of requesting a vote by mail ballot in a language other than English or for the purpose of requesting a vote by mail ballot in an accessible format.(C) Upon request, the county elections official provides written voting materials to voters with disabilities in an accessible format, as required by the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) and the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.).(9) (A) The county elections official establishes a language accessibility advisory committee that is comprised of representatives of language minority communities. The committee shall be established and hold its first meeting before the public meeting required by clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (10).(B) The county elections official establishes a voting accessibility advisory committee that is comprised of voters with disabilities. The committee shall be established and hold its first meeting before the public meeting required by clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (10).(C) In a county with more than 500,000 registered voters, the county elections official establishes a voter education and outreach advisory committee that is comprised of voter engagement, education, and community outreach advocates. The committee shall be established and hold its first meeting before the public meeting required by clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (10).(D) A county with fewer than 50,000 registered voters may establish a joint advisory committee for language minority communities and voters with disabilities.(10) (A) The county elections official develops a draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section in consultation with the public, including all of the following:(i) One meeting, publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the meeting and held prior to the noticing of the draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (C), that includes representatives, advocates, and other stakeholders representing each community for which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance in a language other than English under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(ii) One meeting, publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the meeting and held prior to the noticing of the draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (C), that includes representatives from the disability community and community organizations and individuals that advocate on behalf of, or provide services to, individuals with disabilities.(iii) In a county with more than 500,000 registered voters, one meeting, publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the meeting and held prior to the noticing of the draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (C), that includes voter education and outreach advocates.(B) The county elections official, when developing the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section, considers, at a minimum, all of the following:(i) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to public transportation.(ii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to communities with historically low vote by mail usage.(iii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to population centers.(iv) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to language minority communities.(v) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to voters with disabilities.(vi) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to communities with low rates of household vehicle ownership.(vii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to low-income communities.(viii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to communities of eligible voters who are not registered to vote and may need access to same day voter registration.(ix) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to geographically isolated populations, including Native American reservations.(x) Access to accessible and free parking at vote centers and ballot dropoff locations.(xi) The distance and time a voter must travel by car or public transportation to a vote center and ballot dropoff location.(xii) The need for alternate methods for voters with disabilities for whom vote by mail ballots are not accessible to cast a ballot.(xiii) Traffic patterns near vote centers and ballot dropoff locations.(xiv) The need for mobile vote centers in addition to the number of vote centers established pursuant to this section.(xv) Vote center location on a public or private university or college campus.(C) The county elections official publicly notices the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section and accepts public comments on the draft plan for at least 14 days before the public hearing held pursuant to subparagraph (D).(D) (i) Following the 14-day review period required by subparagraph (C), the county elections official holds a public hearing to consider the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section and to accept public comments. The meeting shall be publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the meeting on the internet websites of the clerk of the county board of supervisors and the county elections official, or, if neither the clerk of the county board of supervisors nor the county elections official maintain an internet website, in the office of the county elections official.(ii) After the public hearing to consider the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section and to accept public comments, the county elections official shall consider any public comments the official receives from the public and shall amend the draft plan in response to the public comments to the extent the official deems appropriate. The county elections official shall publicly notice the amended draft plan and shall accept public comments on the amended draft plan for at least 14 days before the county elections official may adopt the amended draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (E).(E) (i) No later than 120 days before the election and following the 14-day review and comment period required by clause (ii) of subparagraph (D), the county elections official shall adopt a final plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section. The county elections official shall submit the voter education and outreach plan that is required by clause (i) of subparagraph (I) to the Secretary of State for approval.(ii) The Secretary of State shall approve, approve with modifications, or reject a voter education and outreach plan submitted pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (I) within 14 days after the plan is submitted by the county elections official.(iii) The draft plan, the amended draft plan, and the adopted final plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section shall be posted on the internet website of the county elections official in each language in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), and the Secretary of State’s internet website in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.(F) Public meetings held pursuant to this paragraph shall, upon request, provide auxiliary aids and services to ensure effective communication with people with disabilities.(G) Within two years of the adoption of the first plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section, the county elections official shall hold public meetings in accordance with the procedures described in subparagraphs (C) to (F), inclusive, to consider revising the first plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section. Every four years thereafter, the county elections official shall hold public meetings in accordance with the procedures described in subparagraphs (C) to (F), inclusive, to consider revising the plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section.(H) (i) With reasonable public notification, a county elections official may amend a plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section no more than 120 days before the date of an election held pursuant to this section.(ii) With reasonable public notification, a county elections official may amend a plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section more than 120 days before the date of an election held pursuant to this section if the official provides at least 30 days to accept public comments on the amended plan.(I) The plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section, includes all of the following:(i) A voter education and outreach plan that is approved by the Secretary of State and that includes all of the following:(I) A description of how the county elections official will use the media, including social media, newspapers, radio, and television that serve language minority communities for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline.(II) A description of how the county elections official will use the media, including social media, newspapers, radio, and television for purposes of informing voters of the availability of a vote by mail ballot in an accessible format and the process for requesting such a ballot.(III) A description of how the county elections official will have a community presence to educate voters regarding the provisions of this section.(IV) A description of the accessible information that will be publicly available on the accessible internet website of the county elections official.(V) A description of the method used by the county elections official to identify language minority voters.(VI) A description of how the county elections official will educate and communicate the provisions of this section to the public, including:(ia) Communities for which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance in a language other than English under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.). The county elections official shall hold at least one bilingual voter education workshop for each language in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance in a language other than English under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(ib) The disability community, including organizations and individuals that advocate on behalf of, or provide services to, individuals with disabilities. The county elections official shall hold at least one voter education workshop to increase accessibility and participation of eligible voters with disabilities.(VII) A description of how the county will spend the necessary resources on voter education and outreach to ensure that voters are fully informed about the election. This description shall include information about the amount of money the county plans to spend on voter education and outreach activities under the plan, and how that compares to the amount of money spent on voter education and outreach in recent similar elections in the same jurisdiction.(VIII) At least one public service announcement in the media, including newspapers, radio, and television, that serve English-speaking citizens for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline. Outreach made under this subclause shall include access for voters who are deaf or hard of hearing and voters who are blind or visually impaired.(IX) At least one public service announcement in the media, including newspapers, radio, and television, that serve non-English-speaking citizens for each language in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.) for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline.(X) At least two direct contacts with voters for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline. The two direct contacts are in addition to any other required contacts, including, but not limited to, sample ballots and the delivery of vote by mail ballots.(ia) After the first six statewide elections conducted pursuant to this section, a county elections official may make one direct contact if the county elections official does both of the following:(Ia) Revises the plan for the administration of elections pursuant to subparagraph (G) to explain how at least half of the funds saved from not making a second direct contact will be used on targeted outreach to historically underrepresented voters.(Ib) Spends at least half of the funds saved from not making a second direct contact on targeted outreach to historically underrepresented voters.(ib) If direct contact is made by mail, the county elections official must mail at least one copy of each direct contact to voters with the same surname and postal address, in each language requested.(ic) At least one direct contact shall be made with voters during an election that is conducted either in a jurisdiction with fewer than 30,000 registered voters or conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) within 30 days of a regularly scheduled statewide election.(id) Notwithstanding sub-subclause (ia), a county elections official shall make at least two direct contacts with a voter for the first six statewide elections that the voter is registered to vote in the county.(ii) A description of how a voter with disabilities may request and receive a blank vote by mail ballot and, if a replacement ballot is necessary, a blank replacement ballot that a voter with disabilities can mark privately and independently.(iii) A description of how the county elections official will address significant disparities in voter accessibility and participation identified in the report required by subdivision (g).(iv) A description of the methods and standards that the county elections official will use to ensure the security of voting conducted at vote centers.(v) Information about estimated short-term and long-term costs and savings from conducting elections pursuant to this section as compared to recent similar elections in the same jurisdiction that were not conducted pursuant to this section.(vi) To the extent available at the time of publication, information on all of the following:(I) The total number of vote centers to be established.(II) The total number of ballot dropoff locations to be established.(III) The location of each vote center.(IV) The location of each ballot dropoff location and whether it is inside or outside.(V) A map of the locations of each vote center and ballot dropoff location.(VI) The hours of operation for each vote center.(VII) The hours of operation for each ballot dropoff location.(VIII) The security and contingency plans that would be implemented by the county elections official to do both of the following:(ia) Prevent a disruption of the vote center process.(ib) Ensure that the election is properly conducted if a disruption occurs.(IX) The number of election board members and the number of bilingual election board members and the languages spoken.(X) The services provided to voters with disabilities, including, but not limited to, the type and number of accessible voting machines and reasonable modifications at each vote center.(XI) The design, layout, and placement of equipment inside each vote center that protects each voter’s right to cast a private and independent ballot.(vii) A toll-free voter assistance hotline that is accessible to voters who are deaf or hard of hearing, and that is maintained by the county elections official that is operational no later than 29 days before the day of the election until 5 p.m. on the day after the election. The toll-free voter assistance hotline shall provide assistance to voters in all languages in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(J) The plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section is posted in a format that is accessible to persons with disabilities on the internet website of the Secretary of State and on the internet website of the county elections official.(b) Notwithstanding Section 4000 or any other law, any county may conduct a special election as an all-mailed ballot election under this section if all of the following apply:(1) The county elections official has done either of the following:(A) Previously conducted an election as an all-mailed ballot election in accordance with subdivision (a).(B) Adopted a final plan for the administration of elections pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a), in which case the county elections official shall complete all activities provided for in the voter education and outreach plan that is required by clause (i) of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) before the day of the special election.(2) (A) On the day of the election, from 7 a.m. to 8 p.m., inclusive, at least one vote center is provided for every 30,000 registered voters. If the jurisdiction is not wholly contained within the county, the county elections official shall make a reasonable effort to establish a vote center within the jurisdiction where the special election is held.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 30,000 registered voters, the county elections official makes a reasonable effort to establish a vote center.(3) (A) Not less than 10 days before the day of the election, for a minimum of eight hours per day, at least one vote center is provided for every 60,000 registered voters. If the jurisdiction is not wholly contained within the county, the county elections official shall make a reasonable effort to establish a vote center within the jurisdiction where the special election is held.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 30,000 registered voters, the county elections official makes a reasonable effort to establish a vote center.(4) (A) At least one ballot dropoff location is provided for every 15,000 registered voters. At least one ballot dropoff location shall be located within the jurisdiction where the special election is held. All ballot dropoff locations shall be open at least during regular business hours beginning not less than 28 days before the day of the election, and on the day of the election.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 15,000 registered voters, at least one ballot dropoff location shall be provided.(c) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the election day procedures shall be conducted in accordance with Division 14 (commencing with Section 14000).(d) The county elections official may provide, at the official’s discretion, additional ballot dropoff locations and vote centers for purposes of this section.(e) The return of voted vote by mail ballots is subject to Sections 3017 and 3020.(f) For the sole purpose of reporting the results of an election conducted pursuant to this section, upon completion of the ballot count, the county elections official shall divide the jurisdiction into precincts pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 12220) of Chapter 3 of Division 12 and shall prepare a statement of the results of the election in accordance with Sections 15373 and 15374.(g) (1) (A) Within six months of each election conducted pursuant to this section, the Secretary of State shall submit a final report to the Legislature on all of the following information by categories of race, ethnicity, language preference, age, gender, disability, permanent vote by mail status, historical polling place voters, political party affiliation, and language minorities as it relates to the languages required under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.):(i) Voter turnout.(ii) Voter registration.(iii) Ballot rejection rates.(iv) Reasons for ballot rejection.(v) Provisional ballot use.(vi) Accessible vote by mail ballot use.(vii) The number of votes cast at each vote center.(viii) The number of ballots returned at ballot dropoff locations.(ix) The number of ballots returned by mail.(x) The number of persons who registered to vote at a vote center.(xi) Instances of voter fraud.(xii) Any other problems that became known to the county elections official or the Secretary of State during the election or canvass.(B) The report required by subparagraph (A) shall be posted on the internet website of the Secretary of State in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.(C) The report required by subparagraph (A) shall be submitted to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(D) If an election is conducted pursuant to this section, the county shall submit, to the extent possible, to the Secretary of State the information needed for the Secretary of State to prepare the report required by subparagraph (A).(E) The Secretary of State may contract with any qualified person or organization for purposes of preparing the report required by subparagraph (A).(2) Within nine months of the certification of the results of each election conducted pursuant to this section, the county elections official shall post on the official’s internet website a report that compares the cost of elections conducted pursuant to this section to the costs of previous elections. The report shall be posted in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.(h) The Secretary of State shall enforce the provisions of this section pursuant to Section 12172.5 of the Government Code.(i) For purposes of this section, “disability” has the same meaning as defined in subdivisions (j), (m), and (n) of Section 12926 of the Government Code.(j) This section shall remain in effect until December 31, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 8. Section 4005 of the Elections Code, as added by Section 2 of Chapter 480 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:4005. (a) Notwithstanding Section 4000 or any other law, any county may conduct any election as an all-mailed ballot election if all of the following apply:(1) (A) At least two ballot dropoff locations are provided within the jurisdiction where the election is held or the number of ballot dropoff locations are fixed in a manner so that there is at least one ballot dropoff location provided for every 15,000 registered voters within the jurisdiction where the election is held, as determined on the 88th day before the day of the election, whichever results in more ballot dropoff locations. For purposes of this subparagraph, a vote center that includes an exterior ballot drop box counts only as a single ballot dropoff location. Ballot dropoff locations shall comply with the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3025.(B) A ballot dropoff location provided for under this section consists of a secure, accessible, and locked ballot box located as near as possible to established public transportation routes and that is able to receive voted ballots. All ballot dropoff locations shall be open at least during regular business hours beginning not less than 28 days before the day of the election, and on the day of the election. At least one ballot dropoff location shall be an accessible, secured, exterior drop box that is available for a minimum of 12 hours per day including regular business hours.(2) (A) The county elections official permits a voter residing in the county to do any of the following at a vote center:(i) Return, or vote and return, the voter’s vote by mail ballot.(ii) Register to vote, update the voter’s voter registration, and vote pursuant to Section 2170.(iii) Receive and vote a provisional ballot pursuant to Section 3016 or Article 5 (commencing with Section 14310) of Chapter 3 of Division 14.(iv) Receive a replacement ballot upon verification that a ballot for the same election has not been received from the voter by the county elections official. If the county elections official is unable to determine if a ballot for the same election has been received from the voter, the county elections official may issue a provisional ballot.(v) Vote a regular, provisional, or replacement ballot using accessible voting equipment that provides for a private and independent voting experience.(B) Each vote center shall have at least three voting machines that are accessible to voters with disabilities.(3) (A) On the day of the election, from 7 a.m. to 8 p.m., inclusive, and on each of the three days before the election, for a minimum of eight hours per day, at least one vote center is provided for every 10,000 registered voters within the jurisdiction where the election is held, as determined on the 88th day before the day of the election. At least 90 percent of the number of vote centers required by this subparagraph shall be open for all four days during the required times. Up to 10 percent of the number of vote centers required by this subparagraph may be open for less than four days if at least one vote center is provided for every 10,000 registered voters on each day.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 20,000 registered voters, a minimum of two vote centers are provided on the day of the election and on each of the three days before the election within the jurisdiction where the election is held.(4) (A) Beginning 10 days before the day of the election and continuing daily up to and including the fourth day before the election, for a minimum of eight hours per day, at least one vote center is provided for every 50,000 registered voters within the jurisdiction where the election is held, as determined on the 88th day before the day of the election.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 50,000 registered voters, a minimum of two vote centers are provided within the jurisdiction where the election is held.(C) The vote centers provided under this section are established in accordance with the accessibility requirements described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 12280) of Chapter 3 of Division 12, the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.), and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(D) The vote centers provided under this section are equitably distributed across the county so as to afford maximally convenient options for voters and are established at accessible locations as near as possible to established public transportation routes. The vote centers shall be equipped with voting units or systems that are accessible to individuals with disabilities and that provide the same opportunity for access and participation as is provided to voters who are not disabled, including the ability to vote privately and independently in accordance with Sections 12280 and 19240.(E) (i) The vote centers provided under this section have an electronic mechanism for the county elections official to immediately access, at a minimum, all of the following voter registration data:(I) Name.(II) Address.(III) Date of birth.(IV) Language preference.(V) Party preference.(VI) Precinct.(VII) Whether or not the voter has been issued a vote by mail ballot and whether or not a ballot has been received by the county elections official.(ii) The electronic mechanism used to access voter registration data shall not be connected in any way to a voting system.(5) A method is available for voters with disabilities to request and receive a blank vote by mail ballot and, if a replacement ballot is necessary, a blank replacement ballot that voters with disabilities can read and mark privately and independently pursuant to the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).(6) (A) Except as otherwise provided for in this section, election boards for the vote centers established under this section meet the requirements for eligibility and composition pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 4 of Division 12.(B) Each vote center provides language assistance in all languages required in the jurisdiction under subdivision (c) of Section 12303, Section 14032, or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.) in a manner that enables voters of the applicable language minority groups to participate effectively in the electoral process. Each vote center shall post information regarding the availability of language assistance in English and all other languages for which language assistance is required to be provided in the jurisdiction under subdivision (c) of Section 12303, Section 14032, or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(i) If a vote center is located in, or adjacent to, a precinct, census tract, or other defined geographical subsection required to establish language requirements under subdivision (c) of Section 12303, Section 14032, or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), or if it is identified as needing language assistance through the public input process described in clause (ii), the county elections official shall ensure that the vote center is staffed by election board members who speak the required language. If the county elections official is unable to recruit election board members who speak the required language, alternative methods of effective language assistance shall be provided by the county elections official.(ii) The county elections official shall solicit public input regarding which vote centers should be staffed by election board members who are fluent in a language in addition to English pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 12303, Section 14032, and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(iii) The county elections official shall provide notice in the sample ballot, in vote by mail materials, and on the official’s internet website of the specific language services available at each vote center.(iv) Each vote center shall post information regarding the availability of language assistance services, including any language assistance hotlines provided by the county or Secretary of State.(C) Each vote center provides election materials translated in all languages required in the jurisdiction under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(D) Each vote center provides reasonable modifications and auxiliary aids and services as required by the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) and the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.).(7) (A) Beginning 10 days before the election, the county elections official maintains, in an electronic format, an index of voters who have done any of the following at one of the vote centers established pursuant to this section:(i) Registered to vote or updated the voter’s voter registration.(ii) Received and voted a provisional ballot or replacement ballot.(iii) Voted a ballot using equipment at the vote center.(B) The index required by subparagraph (A) includes the same information for each voter as is required to be included on copies of the roster that are posted pursuant to Section 14294. The index required by subparagraph (A) shall be updated continuously during any time that a vote center is open in the jurisdiction.(8) (A) No later than 29 days before the day of the election, the county elections official begins mailing to registered voters a vote by mail ballot packet that includes a return envelope with instructions for the use and return of the vote by mail ballot. The county elections official shall have five days to mail a ballot to each person who is registered to vote on the 29th day before the day of the election and five days for each subsequent registered voter. The county elections official shall not discriminate against any region or precinct in the county in choosing which ballots to mail first within the prescribed five-day mailing period.(B) The county elections official delivers to each voter, with either the sample ballot sent pursuant to Section 13303 or with the vote by mail ballot packet, all of the following:(i) A notice, translated in all languages required under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), that informs voters of all of the following:(I) An all-mailed ballot election is being conducted and each eligible voter will be issued a vote by mail ballot by mail.(II) The voter may cast a vote by mail ballot in person at a vote center during the times and days specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) or on election day.(III) No later than seven days before the day of the election, the voter may request the county elections official to send a vote by mail ballot in a language other than English pursuant to Section 14032 or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), or a facsimile copy of the ballot printed in a language other than English pursuant to Section 14201.(IV) No later than seven days before the day of the election, the voter may request the county elections official to send or deliver a ballot that voters with disabilities can read and mark privately and independently pursuant to the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).(V) Language assistance hotlines provided by the county or Secretary of State.(ii) A list of the ballot dropoff locations and vote centers established pursuant to this section, including the dates and hours they are open. The list shall also be posted on the internet website of the county elections official in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.(iii) A postage-paid postcard that the voter may return to the county elections official for the purpose of requesting a vote by mail ballot in a language other than English or for the purpose of requesting a vote by mail ballot in an accessible format.(C) Upon request, the county elections official provides written voting materials to voters with disabilities in an accessible format, as required by the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) and the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.).(9) (A) The county elections official establishes a language accessibility advisory committee that is comprised of representatives of language minority communities. The committee shall be established and hold its first meeting before the public meeting required by clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (10).(B) The county elections official establishes a voting accessibility advisory committee that is comprised of voters with disabilities. The committee shall be established and hold its first meeting before the public meeting required by clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (10).(C) A county with fewer than 50,000 registered voters may establish a joint advisory committee for language minority communities and voters with disabilities.(10) (A) The county elections official develops a draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section in consultation with the public, including both of the following:(i) One meeting, publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the meeting and held prior to the noticing of the draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (C), that includes representatives, advocates, and other stakeholders representing each community for which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance in a language other than English under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(ii) One meeting, publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the meeting and held prior to the noticing of the draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (C), that includes representatives from the disability community and community organizations and individuals that advocate on behalf of, or provide services to, individuals with disabilities.(B) The county elections official, when developing the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section, considers, at a minimum, all of the following:(i) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to public transportation.(ii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to communities with historically low vote by mail usage.(iii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to population centers.(iv) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to language minority communities.(v) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to voters with disabilities.(vi) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to communities with low rates of household vehicle ownership.(vii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to low-income communities.(viii) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to communities of eligible voters who are not registered to vote and may need access to same day voter registration.(ix) Vote center and ballot dropoff location proximity to geographically isolated populations, including Native American reservations.(x) Access to accessible and free parking at vote centers and ballot dropoff locations.(xi) The distance and time a voter must travel by car or public transportation to a vote center and ballot dropoff location.(xii) The need for alternate methods for voters with disabilities for whom vote by mail ballots are not accessible to cast a ballot.(xiii) Traffic patterns near vote centers and ballot dropoff locations.(xiv) The need for mobile vote centers in addition to the number of vote centers established pursuant to this section.(xv) Vote center location on a public or private university or college campus.(C) The county elections official publicly notices the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section and accepts public comments on the draft plan for at least 14 days before the public hearing held pursuant to subparagraph (D).(D) (i) Following the 14-day review period required by subparagraph (C), the county elections official holds a public hearing to consider the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section and to accept public comments. The meeting shall be publicly noticed at least 10 days in advance of the meeting on the internet websites of the clerk of the county board of supervisors and the county elections official, or, if neither the clerk of the county board of supervisors nor the county elections official maintain an internet website, in the office of the county elections official.(ii) After the public hearing to consider the draft plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section and to accept public comments, the county elections official shall consider any public comments the official receives from the public and shall amend the draft plan in response to the public comments to the extent the official deems appropriate. The county elections official shall publicly notice the amended draft plan and shall accept public comments on the amended draft plan for at least 14 days before the county elections official may adopt the amended draft plan pursuant to subparagraph (E).(E) (i) No later than 120 days before the election and following the 14-day review and comment period required by clause (ii) of subparagraph (D), the county elections official shall adopt a final plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section. The county elections official shall submit the voter education and outreach plan that is required by clause (i) of subparagraph (I) to the Secretary of State for approval.(ii) The Secretary of State shall approve, approve with modifications, or reject a voter education and outreach plan submitted pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (I) within 14 days after the plan is submitted by the county elections official.(iii) The draft plan, the amended draft plan, and the adopted final plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section shall be posted on the internet website of the county elections official in each language in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), and the Secretary of State’s internet website in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.(F) Public meetings held pursuant to this paragraph shall, upon request, provide auxiliary aids and services to ensure effective communication with people with disabilities.(G) Within two years of the adoption of the first plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section, the county elections official shall hold public meetings in accordance with the procedures described in subparagraphs (C) to (F), inclusive, to consider revising the first plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section. Every four years thereafter, the county elections official shall hold public meetings in accordance with the procedures described in subparagraphs (C) to (F), inclusive, to consider revising the plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section.(H) (i) With reasonable public notification, a county elections official may amend a plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section no more than 120 days before the date of an election held pursuant to this section.(ii) With reasonable public notification, a county elections official may amend a plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section more than 120 days before the date of an election held pursuant to this section if the official provides at least 30 days to accept public comments on the amended plan.(I) The plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section, includes all of the following:(i) A voter education and outreach plan that is approved by the Secretary of State and that includes all of the following:(I) A description of how the county elections official will use the media, including social media, newspapers, radio, and television that serve language minority communities for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline.(II) A description of how the county elections official will use the media, including social media, newspapers, radio, and television for purposes of informing voters of the availability of a vote by mail ballot in an accessible format and the process for requesting such a ballot.(III) A description of how the county elections official will have a community presence to educate voters regarding the provisions of this section.(IV) A description of the accessible information that will be publicly available on the accessible internet website of the county elections official.(V) A description of the method used by the county elections official to identify language minority voters.(VI) A description of how the county elections official will educate and communicate the provisions of this section to the public, including:(ia) Communities for which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance in a language other than English under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.). The county elections official shall hold at least one bilingual voter education workshop for each language in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance in a language other than English under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(ib) The disability community, including organizations and individuals that advocate on behalf of, or provide services to, individuals with disabilities. The county elections official shall hold at least one voter education workshop to increase accessibility and participation of eligible voters with disabilities.(VII) A description of how the county will spend the necessary resources on voter education and outreach to ensure that voters are fully informed about the election. This description shall include information about the amount of money the county plans to spend on voter education and outreach activities under the plan, and how that compares to the amount of money spent on voter education and outreach in recent similar elections in the same jurisdiction.(VIII) At least one public service announcement in the media, including newspapers, radio, and television, that serve English-speaking citizens for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline. Outreach made under this subclause shall include access for voters who are deaf or hard of hearing and voters who are blind or visually impaired.(IX) At least one public service announcement in the media, including newspapers, radio, and television, that serve non-English-speaking citizens for each language in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.) for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline.(X) At least two direct contacts with voters for purposes of informing voters of the upcoming election and promoting the toll-free voter assistance hotline. The two direct contacts are in addition to any other required contacts, including, but not limited to, sample ballots and the delivery of vote by mail ballots.(ia) After the first six statewide elections conducted pursuant to this section, a county elections official may make one direct contact if the county elections official does both of the following:(Ia) Revises the plan for the administration of elections pursuant to subparagraph (G) to explain how at least half of the funds saved from not making a second direct contact will be used on targeted outreach to historically underrepresented voters.(Ib) Spends at least half of the funds saved from not making a second direct contact on targeted outreach to historically underrepresented voters.(ib) If direct contact is made by mail, the county elections official must mail at least one copy of each direct contact to voters with the same surname and postal address, in each language requested.(ic) At least one direct contact shall be made with voters during an election that is conducted either in a jurisdiction with fewer than 30,000 registered voters or conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) within 30 days of a regularly scheduled statewide election.(id) Notwithstanding sub-subclause (ia), a county elections official shall make at least two direct contacts with a voter for the first six statewide elections that the voter is registered to vote in the county.(ii) A description of how a voter with disabilities may request and receive a blank vote by mail ballot and, if a replacement ballot is necessary, a blank replacement ballot that a voter with disabilities can mark privately and independently.(iii) A description of how the county elections official will address significant disparities in voter accessibility and participation identified in the report required by subdivision (g).(iv) A description of the methods and standards that the county elections official will use to ensure the security of voting conducted at vote centers.(v) Information about estimated short-term and long-term costs and savings from conducting elections pursuant to this section as compared to recent similar elections in the same jurisdiction that were not conducted pursuant to this section.(vi) To the extent available at the time of publication, information on all of the following:(I) The total number of vote centers to be established.(II) The total number of ballot dropoff locations to be established.(III) The location of each vote center.(IV) The location of each ballot dropoff location and whether it is inside or outside.(V) A map of the locations of each vote center and ballot dropoff location.(VI) The hours of operation for each vote center.(VII) The hours of operation for each ballot dropoff location.(VIII) The security and contingency plans that would be implemented by the county elections official to do both of the following:(ia) Prevent a disruption of the vote center process.(ib) Ensure that the election is properly conducted if a disruption occurs.(IX) The number of election board members and the number of bilingual election board members and the languages spoken.(X) The services provided to voters with disabilities, including, but not limited to, the type and number of accessible voting machines and reasonable modifications at each vote center.(XI) The design, layout, and placement of equipment inside each vote center that protects each voter’s right to cast a private and independent ballot.(vii) A toll-free voter assistance hotline that is accessible to voters who are deaf or hard of hearing, and that is maintained by the county elections official that is operational no later than 29 days before the day of the election until 5 p.m. on the day after the election. The toll-free voter assistance hotline shall provide assistance to voters in all languages in which the county is required to provide voting materials and assistance under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(J) The plan for the administration of elections conducted pursuant to this section is posted in a format that is accessible to persons with disabilities on the internet website of the Secretary of State and on the internet website of the county elections official.(b) Notwithstanding Section 4000 or any other law, any county may conduct a special election as an all-mailed ballot election under this section if all of the following apply:(1) The county elections official has done either of the following:(A) Previously conducted an election as an all-mailed ballot election in accordance with subdivision (a).(B) Adopted a final plan for the administration of elections pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a), in which case the county elections official shall complete all activities provided for in the voter education and outreach plan that is required by clause (i) of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) before the day of the special election.(2) (A) On the day of the election, from 7 a.m. to 8 p.m., inclusive, at least one vote center is provided for every 30,000 registered voters. If the jurisdiction is not wholly contained within the county, the county elections official shall make a reasonable effort to establish a vote center within the jurisdiction where the special election is held.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 30,000 registered voters, the county elections official makes a reasonable effort to establish a vote center.(3) (A) Not less than 10 days before the day of the election, for a minimum of eight hours per day, at least one vote center is provided for every 60,000 registered voters. If the jurisdiction is not wholly contained within the county, the county elections official shall make a reasonable effort to establish a vote center within the jurisdiction where the special election is held.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 30,000 registered voters, the county elections official makes a reasonable effort to establish a vote center.(4) (A) At least one ballot dropoff location is provided for every 15,000 registered voters. At least one ballot dropoff location shall be located within the jurisdiction where the special election is held. All ballot dropoff locations shall be open at least during regular business hours beginning not less than 28 days before the day of the election, and on the day of the election.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for a jurisdiction with fewer than 15,000 registered voters, at least one ballot dropoff location shall be provided.(c) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the election day procedures shall be conducted in accordance with Division 14 (commencing with Section 14000).(d) The county elections official may provide, at the official’s discretion, additional ballot dropoff locations and vote centers for purposes of this section.(e) The return of voted vote by mail ballots is subject to Sections 3017 and 3020.(f) For the sole purpose of reporting the results of an election conducted pursuant to this section, upon completion of the ballot count, the county elections official shall divide the jurisdiction into precincts pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 12220) of Chapter 3 of Division 12 and shall prepare a statement of the results of the election in accordance with Sections 15373 and 15374.(g) (1) (A) Within six months of each election conducted pursuant to this section, the Secretary of State shall submit a final report to the Legislature on all of the following information by categories of race, ethnicity, language preference, age, gender, disability, permanent vote by mail status, historical polling place voters, political party affiliation, and language minorities as it relates to the languages required under Section 14032, subdivision (a) of Section 14201, and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.):(i) Voter turnout.(ii) Voter registration.(iii) Ballot rejection rates.(iv) Reasons for ballot rejection.(v) Provisional ballot use.(vi) Accessible vote by mail ballot use.(vii) The number of votes cast at each vote center.(viii) The number of ballots returned at ballot dropoff locations.(ix) The number of ballots returned by mail.(x) The number of persons who registered to vote at a vote center.(xi) Instances of voter fraud.(xii) Any other problems that became known to the county elections official or the Secretary of State during the election or canvass.(B) The report required by subparagraph (A) shall be posted on the internet website of the Secretary of State in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.(C) The report required by subparagraph (A) shall be submitted to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(D) If an election is conducted pursuant to this section, the county shall submit, to the extent possible, to the Secretary of State the information needed for the Secretary of State to prepare the report required by subparagraph (A).(E) The Secretary of State may contract with any qualified person or organization for purposes of preparing the report required by subparagraph (A).(2) Within nine months of the certification of the results of each election conducted pursuant to this section, the county elections official shall post on the official’s internet website a report that compares the cost of elections conducted pursuant to this section to the costs of previous elections. The report shall be posted in a format that is accessible for people with disabilities pursuant to Section 11135 of the Government Code.(h) The Secretary of State shall enforce the provisions of this section pursuant to Section 12172.5 of the Government Code.(i) For purposes of this section, “disability” has the same meaning as defined in subdivisions (j), (m), and (n) of Section 12926 of the Government Code.(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.SEC. 9. Section 4008 of the Elections Code is amended to read:4008. (a) The Secretary of State shall establish a taskforce that includes representatives of all of the following:(1) County elections officials.(2) Individuals with demonstrated language accessibility experience for languages covered under Section 14032 or the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(3) The disability community and community organizations and individuals that advocate on behalf of, or provide services to, individuals with disabilities.(4) Experts with demonstrated experience in the field of elections.(b) The taskforce shall review elections conducted pursuant to Section 4005 and provide comments and recommendations to the Legislature within six months of each election conducted pursuant to Section 4005. The report required by this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 10. Section 9054 of the Elections Code is amended to read:9054. (a) Whenever a city, county, or city and county is required by Section 14032, Section 14201, or Section 203 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503) or Section 4(f)(4) (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10303(f)(4)) of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 to provide a translation of ballot materials in a language other than English, the Secretary of State shall provide a translation of the ballot title and summary prepared pursuant to Sections 9050 and 9051 and of the ballot label prepared pursuant to Section 13247 in that language to the city, county, or city and county for each state measure submitted to the voters in a statewide election not later than 68 days before that election.(b) When preparing a translation in a language other than English pursuant to subdivision (a), the Secretary of State shall consult with an advisory body consisting of language experts and nonpartisan organizations that advocate on behalf of, or provide services to, individuals that speak that language.(c) All translations prepared pursuant to this section shall be made available for public examination in the same time and manner as the state voter information guide is made available for public examination in accordance with Section 88006 of the Government Code and Section 9092 of this code.(d) The local elections official shall use that translation of the ballot label on the state voter information guide and the official ballot and may not select or contract with another person to provide translations of the same text.SEC. 11.Section 10010 of the Elections Code is amended to read:10010.(a)A political subdivision that changes from an at-large method of election to a district-based election, or that establishes district-based elections, shall do all of the following before a public hearing at which the governing body of the political subdivision votes to approve or defeat an ordinance establishing district-based elections:(1)Before drawing a draft map or maps of the proposed boundaries of the districts, the political subdivision shall hold at least two public hearings over a period of no more than 30 days, at which the public is invited to provide input regarding the composition of the districts. Before these hearings, the political subdivision may conduct outreach to the public, including to non-English-speaking communities, to explain the districting process and to encourage public participation.(2)After all draft maps are drawn, the political subdivision shall publish and make available for release at least one draft map and, if members of the governing body of the political subdivision will be elected in their districts at different times to provide for staggered terms of office, the potential sequence of the elections. The political subdivision shall also hold at least two additional hearings over a period of no more than 45 days, at which the public is invited to provide input regarding the content of the draft map or maps and the proposed sequence of elections, if applicable. The first version of a draft map shall be published at least seven days before consideration at a hearing. If a draft map is revised at or following a hearing, it shall be published and made available to the public for at least seven days before being adopted.(3)If a public hearing held pursuant to this section is consolidated with a regular or special meeting of the governing body of the political subdivision that includes other substantive agenda items, the public hearing shall begin at a fixed time regardless of its order on the agenda, except that the governing body of the political subdivision may first conclude any item being discussed or acted upon, including any associated public comment, when that time occurs. The governing body shall provide notice of the public hearing to the public.(b)In determining the final sequence of the district elections conducted in a political subdivision in which members of the governing body will be elected at different times to provide for staggered terms of office, the governing body shall give special consideration to the purposes of the California Voting Rights Act of 2001, and it shall take into account the preferences expressed by members of the districts.(c)This section applies to, but is not limited to, a proposal that is required due to a court-imposed change from an at-large method of election to a district-based election.(d)For purposes of this section, “at-large method of election,” “district-based-election,” and “political subdivision” have the same meanings as set forth in Section 14026.(e)(1)Before commencing an action to enforce Sections 14027 and 14028, a prospective plaintiff shall send by certified mail a written notice to the clerk of the political subdivision against which the action would be brought asserting that the political subdivision’s method of conducting elections may violate the California Voting Rights Act of 2001.(2)A prospective plaintiff shall not commence an action to enforce Sections 14027 and 14028 within 45 days of the political subdivision’s receipt of the written notice described in paragraph (1).(3)(A)Before receiving a written notice described in paragraph (1), or within 45 days of receipt of a notice, a political subdivision may pass a resolution outlining its intention to transition from at-large to district-based elections, specific steps it will undertake to facilitate this transition, and an estimated timeframe for doing so.(B)If a political subdivision passes a resolution pursuant to subparagraph (A), a prospective plaintiff shall not commence an action to enforce Sections 14027 and 14028 within 90 days of the resolution’s passage.(C)(i)A political subdivision and the prospective plaintiff who first sends a notice pursuant to paragraph (1) may enter into a written agreement to extend the time period described in subparagraph (B) for up to an additional 90 days in order to provide additional time to conduct public outreach, encourage public participation, and receive public input. The written agreement shall include a requirement that the district boundaries be established no later than six months before the political subdivision’s next regular election to select governing board members. However, in a political subdivision that holds a primary election as part of its process for selecting governing board members, the written agreement shall include a requirement that district boundaries be established no later than six months before the political subdivision’s next regular primary election.(ii)No later than 10 days after a political subdivision enters into a written agreement pursuant to clause (i), the political subdivision shall prepare and make available on its internet website a tentative schedule of the public outreach events and the public hearings held pursuant to this section. If a political subdivision does not maintain an internet website, the political subdivision shall make the tentative schedule available to the public upon request.(f)(1)If a political subdivision adopts an ordinance establishing district-based elections pursuant to subdivision (a), a prospective plaintiff who sent a written notice pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) before the political subdivision passed its resolution of intention may, within 30 days of the ordinance’s adoption, demand reimbursement for the cost of the work product generated to support the notice. A prospective plaintiff shall make the demand in writing and shall substantiate the demand with financial documentation, such as a detailed invoice for demography services. A political subdivision may request additional documentation if the provided documentation is insufficient to corroborate the claimed costs. A political subdivision shall reimburse a prospective plaintiff for reasonable costs claimed, or in an amount to which the parties mutually agree, within 45 days of receiving the written demand, except as provided in paragraph (2). In all cases, the amount of the reimbursement shall not exceed the cap described in paragraph (3).(2)If more than one prospective plaintiff is entitled to reimbursement, the political subdivision shall reimburse the prospective plaintiffs in the order in which they sent a written notice pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), and the 45-day time period described in paragraph (1) shall apply only to reimbursement of the first prospective plaintiff who sent a written notice. The cumulative amount of reimbursements to all prospective plaintiffs shall not exceed the cap described in paragraph (3).(3)The amount of reimbursement required by this section is capped at thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), as adjusted annually to the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, United States city average, as published by the United States Department of Labor.SEC. 12.SEC. 11. Section 12303 of the Elections Code is amended to read:12303. (a) A person who cannot read or write the English language is not eligible to act as a member of any precinct board.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that non-English-speaking citizens, like all other citizens, should be encouraged to vote. Therefore, appropriate efforts should be made to minimize obstacles to non-English-speaking citizens voting without assistance.(c) (1) Where the elections official finds that citizens described in subdivision (b) approximate 3 percent or more of the voting-age residents of a precinct, or if interested citizens or organizations provided information that the elections official believes indicates a need for voting assistance for qualified citizens described in subdivision (b), the elections official shall make reasonable efforts to recruit elections officials who are fluent in a language used by citizens described in subdivision (b) and in English. This recruitment shall be conducted through the cooperation of interested citizens and organizations and through voluntarily donated public service notices in the media, including newspapers, radio, television, and the internet, particularly those media that serve the non-English-speaking citizens described in subdivision (b).(2) (A) Within 150 days following each statewide general election, the county elections official shall report to the Secretary of State the number of individuals recruited to serve as members of precinct boards, including the number of individuals recruited who are fluent in each language required to be represented under Section 14032, Section 14201, and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.). The Secretary of State shall issue uniform standard reporting guidelines.(B) The Secretary of State shall post all county reports received under subparagraph (A) on the Secretary of State’s internet website within 180 days following each statewide general election.(3) At each polling place, a member of the precinct board shall identify the languages spoken by the member, other than English, by wearing a name tag, button, sticker, lanyard, or other mechanism, as determined by the county elections official. The text indicating the language skills of the member of the precinct board shall be in the non-English language or languages spoken by that member.(d) At least 14 days before an election, the elections official shall prepare and make available to the public a list of the precincts to which officials were appointed pursuant to this section, including on the county elections official’s internet website, and the language or languages other than English in which they will provide assistance.(e) A county elections official is not required to comply with this section for a particular precinct if the county elections official provides bilingual poll workers pursuant to Section 14032 or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).SEC. 13.SEC. 12. Section 13107 of the Elections Code is amended to read:13107. (a) With the exception of candidates for Justice of the State Supreme Court or court of appeal, immediately under the name of each candidate, and not separated from the name by any line, unless the designation made by the candidate pursuant to Section 8002.5 must be listed immediately below the name of the candidate pursuant to Section 13105, and in that case immediately under the designation, may appear at the option of the candidate only one of the following designations:(1) Words designating the elective city, county, district, state, or federal office which the candidate holds at the time of filing the nomination documents to which the candidate was elected by vote of the people.(2) The word “incumbent” if the candidate is a candidate for the same office which the candidate holds at the time of filing the nomination papers, and was elected to that office by a vote of the people. A candidate shall not use the word “incumbent” if the candidate was elected to their office in an at-large election and is a candidate in a district-based election.(3) No more than three words designating either the current principal professions, vocations, or occupations of the candidate, or the principal professions, vocations, or occupations of the candidate during the calendar year immediately preceding the filing of nomination documents.(4) The phrase “appointed incumbent” if the candidate holds an office by virtue of appointment, and the candidate is a candidate for election to the same office, or, if the candidate is a candidate for election to the same office or to some other office, the word “appointed” and the title of the office. In either instance, the candidate may not use the unmodified word “incumbent” or any words designating the office unmodified by the word “appointed.” However, the phrase “appointed incumbent” shall not be required of a candidate who seeks reelection to an office which the candidate holds and to which the candidate was appointed, as a nominated candidate, in lieu of an election, pursuant to Sections 5326 and 5328 of the Education Code or Section 7228, 7423, 7673, 10229, or 10515 of this code.(b) (1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), for candidates for judicial office, immediately under the name of each candidate, and not separated from the name by any line, only one of the following designations may appear at the option of the candidate:(A) Words designating the city, county, district, state, or federal office held by the candidate at the time of filing the nomination documents.(B) The word “incumbent” if the candidate is a candidate for the same office that the candidate holds at the time of filing the nomination papers.(C) No more than three words designating either the current principal professions, vocations, or occupations of the candidate, or the principal professions, vocations, or occupations of the candidate during the calendar year immediately preceding the filing of nomination documents.(2) For a candidate for judicial office who is an active member of the State Bar employed by a city, county, district, state, or by the United States, the designation shall appear as one of the following:(A) Words designating the actual job title, as defined by statute, charter, or other governing instrument.(B) One of the following ballot designations: “Attorney,” “Attorney at Law,” “Lawyer,” or “Counselor at Law.” The designations “Attorney” and “Lawyer” may be used in combination with one other current principal profession, vocation, or occupation of the candidate, or the principal profession, vocation, or occupation of the candidate during the calendar year immediately preceding the filing of nomination documents.(3) A designation made pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) or paragraph (2) shall also contain relevant qualifiers, as follows:(A) If the candidate is an official or employee of a city, the name of the city shall appear preceded by the words “City of.”(B) If the candidate is an official or employee of a county, the name of the county shall appear preceded by the words “County of.”(C) If the candidate is an official or employee of a city and county, the name of the city and county shall appear preceded by the words “City and County.”(D) If the candidate performs quasi-judicial functions for a governmental agency, the full name of the agency shall be included.(c) A candidate for superior court judge who is an active member of the State Bar and practices law as one of the candidate’s principal professions shall use one of the following ballot designations as the candidate’s ballot designation: “Attorney,” “Attorney at Law,” “Lawyer,” or “Counselor at Law.” The designations “Attorney” and “Lawyer” may be used in combination with one other current principal profession, vocation, or occupation of the candidate, or the principal profession, vocation, or occupation of the candidate during the calendar year immediately preceding the filing of nomination documents.(d) For purposes of this section, all California geographical names shall be considered to be one word. Hyphenated words that appear in any generally available standard reference dictionary, published in the United States at any time within the 10 calendar years immediately preceding the election for which the words are counted, including a generally available standard reference dictionary published online, shall be considered as one word. Each part of all other hyphenated words shall be counted as a separate word.(e) The Secretary of State and any other elections official shall not accept a designation of which any of the following would be true:(1) It would mislead the voter.(2) It would suggest an evaluation of a candidate, such as outstanding, leading, expert, virtuous, or eminent.(3) It abbreviates the word “retired” or places it following any word or words which it modifies.(4) It uses a word or prefix, such as “former” or “ex-,” which means a prior status. The only exception is the use of the word “retired.”(5) It uses the name of any political party, whether or not it has qualified for the ballot.(6) It uses a word or words referring to a racial, religious, or ethnic group.(7) It refers to any activity prohibited by law.(f) If, upon checking the nomination documents and the ballot designation worksheet described in Section 13107.3, the elections official finds the designation to be in violation of any of the restrictions set forth in this section, the elections official shall notify the candidate by registered or certified mail return receipt requested, addressed to the mailing address provided on the candidate’s ballot designation worksheet.(1) The candidate shall, within three days, excluding Saturday, Sunday, and state holidays, from the date the candidate receives notice by registered or certified mail, or from the date the candidate receives actual notice of the violation, whichever occurs first, appear before the elections official or, in the case of the Secretary of State, notify the Secretary of State by telephone, and provide a designation that complies with subdivision (a) or (b).(2) If a candidate fails to provide a designation that complies with subdivision (a) or (b) within the three-day period specified in paragraph (1), a designation shall not appear after the candidate’s name.(g) A designation given by a candidate shall not be changed by the candidate after the final date for filing nomination documents, except as specifically requested by the elections official as specified in subdivision (f) or as provided in subdivision (h). The elections official shall maintain a copy of the ballot designation worksheet for each candidate that appears on the ballot in the county for the same period of time as applied to nomination documents pursuant to Section 17100.(h) The designation shall remain the same for all purposes of both primary and general elections, unless the candidate, at least 98 days before the general election, requests in writing a different designation which the candidate is entitled to use at the time of the request.(i) In all cases, the words so used shall be printed in a manner consistent with the space requirements of Sections 13207 and 13211.(j) If a foreign language translation of a candidate’s designation is required under Section 14032 or the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), as amended, to appear on the ballot in addition to the English language version, it shall be as short as possible, as consistent as is practicable with this section, and shall employ abbreviations and initials wherever possible in order to avoid undue length.SEC. 14.SEC. 13. Section 13209 of the Elections Code is amended to read:13209. Whenever a foreign translation of the ballot is required by Section 14032 or the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended by Public Law 94-73, to appear on the ballot as well as the English language version, the ballot may be so designed as to place the foreign translation next to the voting target.SEC. 15.SEC. 14. Section 13211.7 of the Elections Code is amended to read:13211.7. (a) (1) In jurisdictions required to provide translated ballot materials pursuant to Section 14032 or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503), as that section may be amended from time to time, any ballot that provides a translation of a candidate’s name shall contain a phonetic transliteration of the candidate’s name, except as provided in subdivision (b).(2) This section applies only to character-based languages, including, but not limited to, Mandarin Chinese, Cantonese, Japanese, and Korean.(3) If a candidate’s name is to appear on the ballot in more than one jurisdiction in an election, all of those jurisdictions required to provide translated ballot materials pursuant to Section 14032 or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503) shall use the same phonetic transliteration or character-based translation of the name.(4) (A) In a jurisdiction in which separate ballots containing translations of the candidates’ names are printed in different languages, both the alphabet-based names and the translations of the candidates’ names, for candidates that have translated names, shall appear on the translated ballot.(B) If a jurisdiction is unable to comply with subparagraph (A) due to limitations of its existing voting system, any new voting system purchased by the jurisdiction after July 1, 2020, shall be able to accommodate the requirements of subparagraph (A).(b) If a candidate has a character-based name by birth, that can be verified by birth certificate or other valid identification, the candidate may use that name on the ballot instead of a phonetic transliteration. A candidate who does not have a character-based name by birth, but who identifies by a particular character-based name and can demonstrate to the local elections official that the candidate has been known and identified within the public sphere by that name over the past two years, may use that name instead of a phonetic transliteration.SEC. 16.SEC. 15. Section 13307 of the Elections Code is amended to read:13307. (a) (1) Each candidate for nonpartisan elective office in any local agency, including any city, county, city and county, or district, may prepare a candidate’s statement on an appropriate form provided by the elections official. The statement may include the name, age, and occupation of the candidate and a brief description, of no more than 200 words, of the candidate’s own education and qualifications expressed by the candidate. However, the governing body of the local agency may authorize an increase in the limitations on words for the statement from 200 to 400 words. The statement shall not include the party affiliation of the candidate, nor membership or activity in partisan political organizations.(2) The statement authorized by this subdivision shall be filed in the office of the elections official when the candidate’s nomination papers are returned for filing, if it is for a primary election, or for an election for offices for which there is no primary. The statement shall be filed in the office of the elections official no later than the 88th day before the election, if it is for an election for which nomination papers are not required to be filed. If a runoff election or general election occurs within 88 days of the primary or first election, the statement shall be filed with the elections official by the third day following the governing body’s declaration of the results from the primary or first election.(3) Except as provided in Section 13309, the statement may be withdrawn, but not changed, during the period for filing nomination papers and until 5 p.m. of the next working day after the close of the nomination period.(b) (1) The elections official shall send to each voter a county voter information guide that contains the written statements of each candidate that is prepared pursuant to subdivision (a). The statement of each candidate shall be printed in type of uniform size and darkness, and with uniform spacing.(2) The elections official shall provide a Spanish translation to those candidates who wish to have one, and shall select a person to provide that translation who is one of the following:(A) A certified and registered interpreter on the Judicial Council Master List.(B) An interpreter categorized as “certified” or “professionally qualified” by the Administrative Office of the United States Courts.(C) From an institution accredited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by the United States Secretary of Education.(D) A current voting member in good standing of the American Translators Association.(E) A current member in good standing of the American Association of Language Specialists.(c) (1) In addition to the statement prepared pursuant to subdivision (a), if the elections official who is conducting the election or the county elections official who is conducting a local agency’s election, including a local election that is consolidated with the county election, permits electronic distribution of a candidate’s statement, each candidate for nonpartisan elective office in the local agency may prepare a candidate’s statement for the purpose of electronic distribution pursuant to this subdivision.(2) A statement prepared pursuant to this subdivision shall be posted on the website of the elections official, and may be included in a voter’s pamphlet that is electronically distributed by the elections official pursuant to Section 13300.7, but shall not be included in a voter’s pamphlet that is printed and mailed to voters pursuant to subdivision (b).(3) A statement that is printed in the voter’s pamphlet and mailed to voters pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be included with the statement that is prepared and electronically distributed pursuant to this subdivision.(4) A statement that is prepared and electronically distributed pursuant to this subdivision shall be displayed in type of uniform size and darkness, and with uniform spacing.(5) The elections official shall provide a Spanish translation to those candidates who wish to have one, and shall select a person to provide that translation who is one of the persons listed in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).(d) The local agency may estimate the total cost of printing, handling, translating, mailing, and electronically distributing candidate’s statements filed pursuant to this section, including costs incurred as a result of complying with Section 14032 and the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended. The local agency may require each candidate filing a statement to pay in advance to the local agency the candidate’s estimated pro rata share as a condition of having the candidate’s statement included in the county voter information guide or electronically distributed. In the event the estimated payment is required, the receipt for the payment shall include a written notice that the estimate is just an approximation of the actual cost that varies from one election to another election and may be significantly more or less than the estimate, depending on the actual number of candidates filing statements. Accordingly, the local agency is not bound by the estimate and may, on a pro rata basis, bill the candidate for additional actual expense or refund any excess paid depending on the final actual cost. In the event of underpayment, the local agency may require the candidate to pay the balance of the cost incurred. In the event of overpayment, the local agency that, or the elections official who, collected the estimated cost shall prorate the excess amount among the candidates and refund the excess amount paid within 30 days of the election.(e) This section shall not be deemed to make any statement, or the authors of any statement, free or exempt from any civil or criminal action or penalty because of any false, slanderous, or libelous statements offered for printing electronic distribution pursuant to this section or contained in the county voter information guide.(f) Before the nominating period opens, the local agency for that election shall determine whether a charge shall be levied against that candidate for the candidate’s statement sent to each voter and, if authorized pursuant to subdivision (c), for the electronically distributed candidate’s statement. This decision shall not be revoked or modified after the seventh day before the opening of the nominating period. A written statement of the regulations with respect to charges for handling, packaging, mailing, and electronic distribution shall be provided to each candidate or each candidate’s representative, at the time they pick up the nomination papers.(g) For purposes of this section and Section 13310, the board of supervisors is the governing body of judicial elections.SEC. 17.SEC. 16. Section 14026 of the Elections Code is amended to read:14026. As used in this chapter:(a) “At-large method of election” means any of the following methods of electing members to the governing body of a political subdivision:(1) One in which the voters of the entire jurisdiction elect the members to the governing body.(2) One in which the candidates are required to reside within given areas of the jurisdiction and the voters of the entire jurisdiction elect the members to the governing body.(3) One that combines at-large elections with district-based elections.(b) “District-based elections” means a method of electing members to the governing body of a political subdivision in which the candidate must reside within an election district that is a divisible part of the political subdivision and is elected only by voters residing within that election district.(c) “Limited English proficient individuals” or “LEP individuals” means individuals who speak, read, or understand the English language less than “very well,” according to United States Census Bureau data or comparable data reflecting English language ability collected by a governmental entity, including as self-reported by such persons to a governmental entity.(d) “Political subdivision” means a geographic area of representation created for the provision of government services, including, but not limited to, a general law city, general law county, charter city, charter county, charter city and county, school district, community college district, or other district organized pursuant to state law.(e) “Protected class” means a class of voters who are members of a race, color, or language minority group, as this class is referenced and defined in the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.).(f) “Racially polarized voting” means voting in which there is a difference, as defined in case law regarding enforcement of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.), in the choice of candidates or other electoral choices that are preferred by voters in a protected class, and in the choice of candidates and electoral choices that are preferred by voters in the rest of the electorate. The methodologies for estimating group voting behavior as approved in applicable federal cases to enforce the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.) to establish racially polarized voting may be used for purposes of this section to prove that elections are characterized by racially polarized voting.SEC. 18.SEC. 17. Section 14032 of the Elections Code is repealed.SEC. 19.SEC. 18. Section 14032 is added to the Elections Code, to read:14032. (a) (1) From January 1, 2027, to December 15, 2028, inclusive, any language for which a county elections official is required to provide language assistance under Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503), based on the most recent applicable federal determination, is a covered language for purposes of this section unless and until superseded by a determination of the Secretary of State made pursuant to paragraph (2).(2) On or before December 15, 2028, the Secretary of State, using the best available data, shall determine which counties and other political subdivisions meet one or more of the following criteria, and shall publish on the Secretary’s internet website a list of counties and other political subdivisions and the languages in which each county or political subdivision is required to provide language access:(A) Five thousand or more citizens of voting age in a county are limited English proficient individuals and are either members of a single language minority group or speak a shared language.(B) Five percent or more of the citizens of voting age in a county are limited English proficient individuals and are either members of a single language minority group or speak a shared language.(C) In the case of a political subdivision that contains all or any part of an Indian reservation, the number of voting-age American Indian or Alaska Native citizens within the Indian reservation who are limited English proficient individuals is more than 5 percent of all residents of the reservation.(3) On or before December 15, 2031, and on or before December 15 of every fifth year thereafter, the Secretary of State shall make and publish updated determinations pursuant to paragraph (2).(b) (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, for each election, in a political subdivision where a language is identified under subdivision (a), (a) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), the elections official shall provide language assistance in accordance with this subdivision. Compliance with this subdivision requires materials and assistance to be provided in a way designed to allow voters who speak a particular shared language other than English to be effectively informed of, and participate effectively in, voting-connected activities.(2) An elections official required to provide language assistance in a particular language other than English pursuant to subdivision (a) shall ensure that each of the following forms of voting assistance are effectively translated and provided to voters who are LEP individuals:(A) Translated ballots. All official and sample ballots used on election day, vote by mail ballots, and the facsimile of an official ballot provided pursuant to Section 13300 shall be fully translated into the covered language and made available to voters in all polling places and online.(B) Voter registration forms and instructions. All forms used for voter registration, including online, mail, and in-person registration, along with any explanatory materials, shall be provided in the covered language.(C) Voter education and outreach materials. All voter education and outreach publications that the political subdivision distributes to the public concerning voter registration, voting options, election dates and deadlines, or voting rights, including, but not limited to, guides, brochures, and flyers, shall be provided in the covered language.(D) Voting-related notices. All public notices relating to the electoral process, including notices about registration deadlines, polling location changes, voter education materials, election-related rights and prohibitions, and voting instructions that provide direction during the voting process shall be fully translated and disseminated in the covered language to the same extent that English-language notices are made available.(E) Notice of in-language assistance availability. Signage identifying the availability of translated ballots, bilingual poll workers, and live over-the-phone interpretation services shall be made available in the covered language on the political subdivision’s website, at local elections offices, and at polling places.(F) (i) In-person bilingual poll workers and interpreters. A covered political subdivision shall have sufficient trained bilingual poll workers or interpreters available to provide effective language assistance in the covered language to any voters who need it. If the elections official is unable to recruit precinct board members who speak the required language, alternative methods of effective language assistance shall be provided by the elections official.(ii) (I) Bilingual staff who speak a language other than English shall identify the languages spoken by that member by wearing a name tag, button, sticker, lanyard, or other mechanism, as determined by the elections official. The text indicating the language skills of the member of the precinct board shall be in the non-English language or languages spoken by that member.(II) At least 14 days before an election, the elections official shall prepare and make available to the public a list of the precincts to which officials were appointed pursuant to this subparagraph, including on the elections official’s website, and the language or languages other than English in which they will provide assistance.(G) Live interpretation services via telephone. Live language interpretation services by telephone, allowing voters to request and receive real-time assistance in the covered language for any voter-related inquiries beginning 29 days before election day until the election has been certified. Each polling place shall post information regarding the availability of language assistance services, including any language assistance hotlines provided by the elections official or Secretary of State.(H) Website. Any information relating to voter registration, polling locations, official ballots, or other voting related materials and notifications provided on the website used by an elections official to share information related to elections and voting shall be made available in the covered language.(3) An elections official shall provide the applicable translations of the information described in paragraph (2) to any voter who has indicated a language preference for one of the languages into which the materials are translated.(c) (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, for languages identified pursuant to subdivision (a), whenever the Secretary of State or any state agency provides, in any manner, forms, instructions, assistance, or other materials or services to voters relating to elections, registration, or voting in counties subject to the requirements of this section, the Secretary of State or state agency shall also comply with the requirements of this section.(2) The Secretary of State shall provide the applicable translations of the information required under this subdivision to any voter who has indicated a language preference for one of the languages into which the materials are translated.(d) Compliance with subdivisions (b) and (c) requires materials and assistance to be provided in a way designed to allow voters who speak English less than very well to be effectively informed of and participate effectively in voting-connected activities. All materials and services provided by the state or elections official in a language other than English pursuant to this section shall be of equal quality to the corresponding English-language materials and shall be distributed at the same time as the corresponding English-language materials. All translated materials shall convey the intent and essential meaning of the original English-language text or communication. Translated materials produced solely by automated translation services are presumed to be insufficient to completely convey intent and essential meaning.(e) The requirements in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, shall be interpreted at least as broadly as Section 203 (52 U.S. Sec 10503) of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 for both written and oral information, instructions, assistance, or services. For any language that is not, as of January 1, 2027, a language covered by Section 203 (52 U.S.C. Sec 10503), the requirements of this subdivision shall apply beginning January 1, 2028.(f) (1) If interested citizens or entities provide the Secretary of State with a preponderance of evidence that significant need in a political subdivision exists for translated election materials and services for a language group not covered under subdivision (a), the Secretary of State shall require materials and services to be provided in the applicable language in the political subdivision.(2) Evidence supporting a request made under this subdivision may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:(A) Reliable statistical data.(B) Evidence that the language minority community has been historically undercounted or underrepresented in census, survey, or administrative data, including, but not limited to, discrepancies between community-based estimates and official population data, or documentation from the United States Census Bureau or other reliable sources acknowledging an undercount.(C) Testimony or affidavits from individuals or entities representing or serving the language minority community.(D) Testimony or affidavits from experts in demography or other relevant fields.(E) Evidence of structural, procedural, or informational barriers that disproportionately impact voters in the language group, including, but not limited to, low turnout rates, high provisional ballot use, or lack of access to translated materials.(3) Interested citizens or entities may request a public informational hearing before an ad hoc subcommittee of the Language Accessibility Advisory Committee. The hearing shall be held within 45 days of the request.(4) The Secretary of State shall issue a written determination in response to a request submitted under this subdivision within 60 days of receipt of the request or the public information hearing, whichever is later, that includes a finding of facts and reasons for the determination. The written determination shall be posted on the Secretary of State’s website.(5) A determination granting coverage under this subdivision shall deem the political subdivision and language to be covered under this section to the same extent as if the language had been identified pursuant to subdivision (a).(6) A determination to include coverage shall specify a date by which the language shall be covered. The date shall take into account the need for language assistance and the election calendar. The first implementation date shall not occur more than 180 days after the date of the written determination.(g) The Secretary of State may adopt any rules or regulations necessary to implement this section.SEC. 20.SEC. 19. Section 14033 is added to the Elections Code, to read:14033. The Legislature finds and declares that this chapter addresses a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, this chapter applies to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 21.SEC. 20. Section 14105.3 of the Elections Code is amended to read:14105.3. (a) The federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.) requires voting information to be publicly posted at each polling place for each election for federal office. Voting information is defined as including general information on voting rights under applicable federal and state laws, including information on the right of an individual to cast a provisional ballot and instructions on how to contact the appropriate officials if these rights are alleged to have been violated.(b) The Secretary of State shall print posters and other appropriate materials setting forth the voter rights listed in Section 2300. The posters shall be printed in as many languages as the Secretary of State determines are necessary, but, at a minimum, in sufficient languages to comply with Section 14032 and Section 14201, and with the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.). The Secretary of State shall distribute the posters and materials to all county elections officials sufficiently in advance of statewide elections.SEC. 22.SEC. 21. Section 14111 of the Elections Code is amended to read:14111. Translations of the ballot measures and ballot instructions, as required by Section 14032 and Section 14201, shall be provided by a person selected by the elections official who is one of the following:(a) A certified and registered interpreter on the Judicial Council Master List.(b) An interpreter categorized as “certified” or “professionally qualified” by the Administrative Office of the United States Courts.(c) From an institution accredited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by the United States Secretary of Education.(d) A current voting member in good standing of the American Translators Association.(e) A current member in good standing of the American Association of Language Specialists.SEC. 23.SEC. 22. Section 14200 of the Elections Code is amended to read:14200. A member of each precinct board shall cause the following voting information to be publicly posted at each polling place:(a) A sample version of the ballot that will be used for the election.(b) Information regarding the date of the election and the hours during which polling places will be open.(c) Instructions on how to vote, including how to cast a vote and how to cast a provisional ballot.(d) Instructions for mail-in registrants and first-time voters under Section 303(b) of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).(e) General information on voting rights under applicable federal and state laws, including information on the right of an individual to cast a provisional ballot and instructions on how to contact the appropriate officials if these rights are alleged to have been violated.(f) General information on federal and state laws regarding prohibitions on acts of fraud and misrepresentation as they pertain to elections.(g) Information regarding the languages other than English in which members of the precinct board can assist voters. The information shall be provided in all of the languages other than English spoken by the members.(h) Information regarding other available language assistance, such as a toll-free voter assistance hotline.SEC. 24.SEC. 23. Section 14201 of the Elections Code is amended to read:14201. (a) In counties and precincts where the Secretary of State has determined that it is appropriate, the county elections official shall provide facsimile copies of the ballot, as described in subdivision (b), with the ballot measures and ballot instructions printed in Spanish, one of which shall be posted in a conspicuous location in the polling place and at least one of which shall be made available for voters at the polling place to use as a reference when casting a private ballot. Facsimile ballots shall also be printed in other languages and provided in the same manner if a significant and substantial need is found by the Secretary of State. A facsimile copy of the ballot available for voters to use in casting a private ballot shall be sufficiently distinct in appearance from a regular ballot to prevent voters from attempting to vote on the facsimile copy.(b) (1) In determining if it is appropriate to provide the election materials in Spanish or other languages, the Secretary of State shall determine the number of residents of voting age in each county and precinct who are members of a single language minority, and who lack sufficient skills in English to vote without assistance. If the number of these residents equals 3 percent or more of the voting-age residents of a particular county or precinct, or if interested citizens or organizations provide the Secretary of State with information that gives the Secretary of State sufficient reason to believe a need for the furnishing of facsimile ballots, the Secretary of State shall find a need to provide at least two facsimile copies with the ballot measures and ballot instructions printed in Spanish or other applicable language in the affected polling places.(2) If the Secretary of State determines that the number of voting-age residents in a precinct who are members of a single language minority and who lack sufficient skills in English to vote without assistance exceeds 20 percent of the voting-age residents in that precinct, the county elections official shall provide at least four facsimile copies of the ballot in the language of that language minority, one of which shall be posted in a conspicuous location in the polling place and at least three of which shall be made available for voters at the polling place to use as a reference when casting a private ballot.(c) (1) In polling places where facsimile copies of the ballot are necessary, members of the precinct boards shall be trained on the purpose and proper handling of the facsimile copies of the ballot and shall be prepared to inform voters of the existence of the facsimile copies of the ballot, as appropriate.(2) If a voter requests a facsimile copy of a ballot that is available in the voter’s language of preference pursuant to subdivision (a), a member of the precinct board shall provide the facsimile copy of the ballot to the voter.(3) In polling places where facsimile copies of the ballot are necessary, a sign near the roster shall inform voters of the existence of the facsimile copies of the ballot. The sign shall be in English and in the language or languages of the facsimile copies available in that polling place.(d) At least 14 days before an election, the county elections official shall provide information on the county elections internet website identifying all polling places in the county and the languages of facsimile copies of the ballot that will be available to voters at each polling place. Explanatory information pertaining to the list of polling places, but not the list itself, shall be available in all languages in which the county provides facsimile copies of the ballot.(e) The county elections official shall include text in the county voter information guide that refers voters with language needs to the portion of the county elections internet website containing the information specified in subdivision (d). The text shall be in all languages in which the county provides facsimile copies of the ballot.(f) The Secretary of State shall make the determinations and findings set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) by January 1 of each year in which the Governor is elected.(g) (1) A county elections official shall not be required to provide facsimile copies of the ballot in a particular language if the county elections official is required to provide translated ballots in that language pursuant to Section 14032 or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(2) In a polling place where a county elections official is required pursuant to subdivision (a) to provide a facsimile copy of the ballot in a language other than English, the county elections official may instead provide voters with a ballot translated into that language. A county elections official who provides and publicizes translated ballots in the same manner as translated ballots provided and publicized pursuant to Section 14032 or Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), in lieu of providing facsimile copies of the ballot in any language required under subdivision (a), need not comply with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) as pertaining to that language.(h) It is the intent of the Legislature that non-English-speaking citizens, like all other citizens, should be encouraged to vote. Therefore, appropriate efforts should be made on a statewide basis to minimize obstacles to voting by citizens who lack sufficient skill in English to vote without assistance.SEC. 25.SEC. 24. Section 14219 of the Elections Code is amended to read:14219. The precinct board shall provide, upon request, to a voter for use in the voting booth or compartment, a copy of the facsimile ballot containing ballot measures and instructions printed in Spanish or in other languages, as required by Section 14032 or Section 14201, unless county voter information guides and ballots for voting are already being provided in that language under the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended by Public Law 94-73.SEC. 26.SEC. 25. Section 14282 of the Elections Code is amended to read:14282. (a) If a voter is unable to mark a paper ballot or the ballot marking device, the voter shall receive the assistance of not more than two persons selected by the voter, other than the voter’s employer, an agent of the voter’s employer, or an officer or agent of the union of which the voter is a member.(b) The county elections official shall provide information on the county elections internet website and in the county voter information guide informing voters that a voter who is unable to mark a ballot may bring up to two individuals to the polls to assist them in voting as specified in subdivision (a), and that a voter with a disability may vote a regular ballot outside a polling place in accordance with subdivision (d). The information shall be available in all languages for which the county has requirements under Section 14032 and Section 14201 and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).(c) A person assisting a voter shall not divulge any information regarding the marking of the ballot.(d) (1) A voter with a disability may appear outside the polling place and vote a regular ballot. The person may vote the ballot in a place that is as near as possible to the polling place and that is accessible to people with disabilities. A precinct board member shall take a regular ballot or ballot marking device to that person, qualify that person to vote, and return the voted ballot to the polling place.(2) A precinct board member may satisfy paragraph (1) by only bringing a regular ballot outside to the voter if the county does not have the capability to bring the ballot marking device outside of the polling place.(3) Signage shall be posted outside the polling place and adjacent to the area where the voter may appear to vote indicating that the option is available for a voter with a disability to vote there. The polling place shall establish a method for a voter with a disability to contact a precinct board member in order to vote outside the polling place, such as a posted phone number, doorbell device, or the stationing of a precinct board member outside the polling place.SEC. 27.SEC. 26. Section 19101 of the Elections Code is amended to read:19101. (a) The Secretary of State shall adopt and publish voting system standards and regulations governing the use of voting systems that meet the minimum requirements of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 21081 et seq.) and that incorporate best practices in election technology. The Secretary of State may require additional testing to ensure that voting systems meet the requirements of this code.(b) Voting system standards adopted by the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following requirements:(1) The machine or device and its software shall be suitable for the purpose for which it is intended.(2) The system shall preserve the secrecy of the ballot.(3) The system shall be safe from fraud or manipulation.(4) The system shall be accessible to voters with disabilities pursuant to Section 19242 and applicable federal laws.(5) The system shall be accessible to voters who require assistance in a language other than English if the language is one in which a ballot or ballot materials are required to be made available to voters pursuant to Section 14032, Section 14201, and applicable federal laws.SEC. 28.Section 21130 of the Elections Code is amended to read:21130.(a)Following or concurrent with the decision to establish district-based elections for a legislative body, or following each federal decennial census for a legislative body that is already elected using district-based elections, the districting body shall, by ordinance or resolution, adopt boundaries for all of the election districts of the legislative body so that the election districts shall be substantially equal in population as required by the United States Constitution.(1)Population equality shall be based on the total population of residents of the local jurisdiction as determined by the most recent federal decennial census for which the redistricting data described in Public Law 94-171 are available.(2)Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an incarcerated person, as that term is used in Section 21003, shall not be counted towards a local jurisdiction’s population, except for an incarcerated person whose last known place of residence may be assigned to a census block in the local jurisdiction, if information about the last known place of residence for incarcerated persons is included in the computerized database for redistricting that is developed in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 8253 of the Government Code, and that database is made publicly available.(b)The districting body shall adopt election district boundaries that comply with the United States Constitution, the California Constitution, the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.), and Section 14032.(1)Consistent with the districting body’s existing obligations under the federal Voting Rights Act, the districting body shall determine whether it is possible to create an election district or districts in which a minority group is sufficiently large and geographically compact to constitute a majority in a single-member district, as set forth in Thornburg v. Gingles, 478 U.S. 30 (1986), and as interpreted in case law regarding enforcement of the federal Voting Rights Act with respect to redistricting. The districting body shall publish on its redistricting web page, at a minimum, the results of its analysis within seven days of completing the analysis or prior to adopting election district boundaries, whichever occurs first.(2)If the districting body, consistent with its existing obligations under the federal Voting Rights Act, conducts an analysis to determine whether “racially polarized voting,” as defined in case law regarding enforcement of the federal Voting Rights Act, exists in the local jurisdiction, the districting body shall publish on its redistricting web page, at a minimum, a summary of its analysis and findings within seven days of completing the analysis or prior to adopting election district boundaries, whichever occurs first.(c)The districting body shall adopt election district boundaries using the following criteria as set forth in the following order of priority:(1)To the maximum extent practicable, election districts shall be geographically contiguous. Areas that meet only at the points of adjoining corners are not contiguous. Areas that are separated by water and not connected by a bridge, tunnel, or regular ferry service are not contiguous.(2)To the maximum extent practicable, and where it does not conflict with the preceding criterion in this subdivision, the geographic integrity of any local neighborhood or local community of interest shall be respected in a manner that minimizes its division. A “community of interest” is a population that shares common social or economic interests that should be included within a single election district for purposes of its effective and fair representation. Characteristics of communities of interest may include, but are not limited to, shared public policy concerns such as education, public safety, public health, environment, housing, transportation, and access to social services. Characteristics of communities of interest may also include, but are not limited to, cultural districts, shared socioeconomic characteristics, similar voter registration rates and participation rates, and shared histories. Communities of interest do not include relationships with political parties, incumbents, or political candidates.(3)To the maximum extent practicable, and where it does not conflict with the preceding criteria in this subdivision, the geographic integrity of a city or census designated place shall be respected in a manner that minimizes its division. This paragraph does not apply to a city.(4)To the maximum extent practicable, and where it does not conflict with the preceding criteria in this subdivision, election districts shall be bounded by natural and artificial barriers, by streets, or by the boundaries of the local jurisdiction. Election district boundaries should be easily identifiable and understandable by residents.(5)To the maximum extent practicable, and where it does not conflict with the preceding criteria in this subdivision, election districts shall be drawn to encourage geographical compactness in a manner that nearby areas of population are not bypassed in favor of more distant populations.(d)The districting body shall not adopt election district boundaries for the purpose of favoring or discriminating against an incumbent, political candidate, or political party.(e)The districting body shall not adopt election district boundaries using any criterion that is prioritized over the criteria in subdivision (c) or that, expressly or as applied, conflicts with one of the requirements in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, except as provided in subdivision (g).(f)Within 21 days of adopting final election district boundaries, the districting body shall issue a report that explains the basis on which the districting body made its decisions in achieving compliance with the requirements and criteria described in this section, including, as to each neighborhood, community of interest, city, or census designated place that was split into two or more districts, the reason for that split. This paragraph does not apply to a special district or small education district. Notwithstanding subdivision (i) of Section 23003, if a local jurisdiction establishes a hybrid redistricting commission to recommend changes to the legislative body’s district boundaries, the report required by this subdivision shall be issued by the districting body, and not by the commission.(g)Subdivision (c) does not apply to a charter city that has adopted comprehensive or exclusive redistricting criteria in its city charter that includes a requirement to keep whole either communities of interest or neighborhoods. In such a charter city, the report required by subdivision (f) shall explain the basis on which the districting body made its decisions in achieving compliance with the requirements described in this section and the criteria described in the city charter, including, as to each neighborhood or community of interest that was split into two or more districts, the reason for that split. For purposes of this subdivision, “comprehensive or exclusive” means either that the city’s charter excludes consideration of redistricting criteria other than those that are identified in the city charter or that the city’s charter provides two or more mandatory traditional redistricting criteria other than the requirement that districts be equal in population.(h)If a local jurisdiction establishes an advisory or hybrid redistricting commission to recommend changes to the legislative body’s district boundaries, any recommendation adopted by the commission shall comply with the requirements of subdivisions (a) through (e), inclusive, except as provided in subdivision (g).(i)The criteria and requirements of this section apply to all election district boundaries adopted after January 1, 2024, including district boundaries adopted when a legislative body transitions from being elected at-large to elected by districts or from districts.SEC. 29.SEC. 27. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.